District of Columbia statutes.
22-3018

Attempts to commit sexual offenses.

Any person who attempts to commit an offense under this subchapter shall be imprisoned for a term of years not to exceed 15 years where the maximum prison term authorized for the offense is life or for not more than 1/2 of the maximum prison sentence authorized for the offense and, in addition, may be fined an amount not to exceed 1/2 of the maximum fine authorized for the offense.

History

May 23, 1995, D.C. Law 10-257, § 217, 42 DCR 53

Section References

This section is referenced in § 22-3007, § 22-3011, § 22-3012, § 22-3017, § 22-4001, and § 24-112.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 22-4118.